tr: Ölçüm Tipi: Göğüs; Kıyafetler; Kulak; Parmak; Alın; Oral; Rektal; Koltuk altı; Her türden mekana uygun; Bel; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta mjerenja: Grudi; Odjeća; Uho; Prst; Čelo; Oralno; Rektalno; Ispod pazuha; Univerzalno; Zapešće; Ostalo
de: Messart: Brust; Kleidung; Ohr; Finger; Stirn; Oral; Rektal; Unterarm; Universell; Handgelenk; Sonstiges
hu: Méréstípus: Mell; Ruházat; Fül; Ujj; Homlok; Orális; Rektális; Hónalj; Általános; Csukló; Egyéb
nb: Måletype: Bryst; Klær; Øre; Finger; Panne; Oral; Rektal; Underarm; Universal; Håndledd; Annet
ko: 측정 유형: 가슴; 옷; 귀; 손가락; 이마; 구강; 직장; 겨드랑이; 범용; 손목; 기타
lt-LT: Matavimo tipas: Krūtinė; Drabužiai; Ausis; Pirštas; Kakta; Burna; Tiesioji žarna; Pažastis; Universalus; Riešas; Kita
th: ประเภทการวัด: เนื้ออก; เสื้อผ้า; หู; นิ้ว; หน้าผาก; ช่องปาก; ลำไส้ตรง; ใต้วงแขน; อเนกประสงค์; ข้อมือ; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ měření: Prsa; Oblečení; Ucho; Na prst; Čelo; Ústní; Rektální; Podpaží; Univerzální; Zápěstí; Jiné
vi: Kiểu đo: Ức cừu; Quần áo; Tai; Dùng ngón tay; Trán; Thuốc uống; Trực tràng; Nách; Phổ biến; Cổ tay; Khác
sv: Mättyp: Bröst; Kläder; Öra; Finger; Panna; Oral; Rektal; Underarm; Universell; Handled; Övrigt
en: Measuring type: Breast; Clothes; Ear; Finger; Forehead; Oral; Rectal; Underarm; Universal; Wrist; Other
sk-SK: Typ merania: Prsia; Oblečenie; Ucho; Prst; Čelo; Ústny; Rektálny; Podpazušie; Univerzálny; Zápästný; Iné
ro-RO: Tipul de măsurare: Piept; Haine; Ureche; Deget; Frunte; Oral; Rectal; Subraț; Universal; Încheietura mâinii; Altele
fr: Type de mesure: Poitrine; Vêtements; Oreille; Doigt; Front; Oral; Rectal; Aisselles; Universel; Poignet; Autre
da: Måletype: Bryst; Tøj; Øre; Finger; Pande; Oral; Rektal; Underarm; Universal; Håndled; Andet
it: Tipo di misurazione: Petto; Vestiti; Orecchio; Dito; Fronte; Orale; Retto; Ascella; Universale; Polso; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta merjenja: Prsi; Oblačila; Uho; Prst; Čelo; Oralno; Rektalno; Pod pazduho; Univerzalno; Zapestno; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип на измерване: Гръден кош; Дрехи; Ухо; Пръст; Чело; Орален; Ректален; Под мишницата; Универсален; Китка; Други
fi: Mittaustyyppi: Rinta; Vaatteet; Korva; Sormi; Otsa; Oraalinen; Rektaalinen; Kainalo; Yleinen; Ranne; Muu
es: Tipo de medición: Pecho; Ropa; Oreja; Dedo; Frente; Oral; Rectal; Axilar; Universal; Muñeca; Otros
zh-CN: 测量类型: 胸脯肉; 衣服; 耳朵; 手指; 前额; 口服; 直肠; 腋下; 通用; 手腕; 其他
zh-TW: 測量類型: 胸部; 衣服; 耳朵; 手指; 額頭; 口腔; 直腸的; 腋下的; 通用; 手腕; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de medição: Peitoral; Vestuário; Ouvido; Dedo; Testa; Oral; Retal; Axilas; Universal; Pulso; Outro
nl: Meettype: Borst; Kleren; Oor; Vinger; Voorhoofd; Mondeling; Rectaal; Onderarm; Universeel; Pols; Andere
pl: Typ pomiaru: Pierś; Odzież; Ucho; Palec; Czoło; Ustnie; Doodbytniczy; Pod pachami; Uniwersalny; Nadgarstek; Inne
ja: 測定タイプ: 胸部; 服; 耳; フィンガーパペット; 額; 口腔; 直腸; 脇の下; ユニバーサル; 手首; その他
ru: Тип измерения: Грудь; Одежда; Ухо; Палец; Лоб; Оральный; Ректальный; Подмышки; Универсальный; Запястье; Другой
el: Τύπος μέτρησης: Στήθος; Ρούχα; Αυτί; Δάχτυλο; Μέτωπο; Στοματική χρήση; Από το ορθό; Μασχάλη; Καθολικής χρήσης; Καρπού; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de medição: Peito; Roupas; Orelha; Dedo; Testa; Oral; Retal; Axilas; Universal; Pulso; Outro